Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
163D

AGRIBUSINESS
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

163D-1 Findings and purpose

163D-2 Definitions

163D-3 Agribusiness development corporation;
board of

directors; established

163D-4 Powers; generally

163D-5 Hawaii agribusiness plan

163D-6 Subsidiaries; establishment

163D-7 Agricultural projects; agricultural
development plans

163D-8 Project facility program

163D-8.5 Approval of projects, plans, and programs

163D-9 Bonds

163D-10 Revenue bonds; payment and security

163D-11 Revenue bonds; interest rate, price, and
sale

163D-12 Revenue bonds; investment of proceeds, and
redemption

163D-13 Revenue bonds; special funds

163D-14 Trustee; designation, duties

163D-15 Trust indenture

163D-15.5 Waiahole water system revolving fund

163D-15.6 Commitment and preservation of
agricultural leases

163D-16 Use of public lands; acquisition of state
lands

163D-17 Hawaii agricultural development revolving
fund;

established; use of corporation funds

163D-18 Exemption from taxation

163D-19 Annual report

Part II. Acquisition of Important
Agricultural Lands

163D-31 Acquisitions
of important agricultural lands

authorized by
the legislature

163D-32 Acquisitions;
payment

163D-33 Installment
purchase agreements; interest payment

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next